North Carolina, session 2025, HB929.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 130A-325 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(7) The introducing or depositing of fluoride or any chemical containing fluoride
to a public water system by any person. This subdivision does not apply to (i)
any water treatment process where fluoride is naturally occurring in a water
source or (ii) the use of fluoride for an industrial or manufacturing process not
related to public water treatment."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective January 1, 2026.
*H929-v-1*